Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.040

Compensation and travel expenses of board members.

Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW. No expense may be incurred by members of the board except in connection with board meetings without prior approval of the secretary.

[ 2022 c 240 s 8; 1991 c 3 s 240; 1984 c 287 s 51; 1983 c 102 s 4; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 53; 1974 ex.s. c 44 s 3; 1967 ex.s. c 50 s 4; 1959 c 92 s 5; 1941 c 71 s 5; 1913 c 79 s 2; 1907 c 124 s 13; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10040-5.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Severability—Effective date—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.